Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 16.1 Judicial Selection

8-16.1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:

“Attorney” means a resident of the state of Rhode Island who is licensed to practice law in the state of Rhode Island and who is a current member in good standing of the Rhode Island bar association; and

“Member of the general public” means a person who is a resident of the state of Rhode Island and who is not a licensed member of any bar association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 42, § 1.

8-16.1-2.
Judicial nominating commission.

There is hereby established an independent nonpartisan judicial nominating commission which shall consist of nine (9) members, all of whom shall be residents of the state of Rhode Island, and who shall be appointed as follows:

Within seven (7) days after June 2, 1994:

The speaker of the house of representatives shall submit to the governor a list of at least three (3) attorneys;

The president of the senate shall submit to the governor a list of at least three (3) persons who may be attorneys and/or members of the public;

The speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate shall jointly submit to the governor a list of four (4) members of the public;

The minority leader of the house of representatives shall submit to the governor a list of at least three (3) members of the public; and

The minority leader of the senate shall submit to the governor a list of at least three (3) members of the public.

Within fourteen (14) days after June 2, 1994, the governor shall appoint to the commission:

One person from each of the lists submitted in accordance with subsection (a)(1) of this section;

Three (3) attorneys, without regard to any of the lists; and

One member of the public, without regard to any of the lists.

The governor and the nominating authorities hereunder shall exercise reasonable efforts to encourage racial, ethnic, and gender diversity within the commission.

Members of the commission shall serve for terms of four (4) years, except that, of the members first appointed:

The individual appointed from the list submitted by the minority leader of the house of representatives and one of the attorneys appointed by the governor without regard to any of the lists shall serve for one year;

The individual appointed from the list submitted by the minority leader of the senate and one of the attorneys appointed by the governor without regard to any of the lists shall serve for two (2) years;

The individual appointed from the list submitted jointly by the speaker of the house of representatives and by the president of the senate and the member of the public appointed by the governor without regard to any of the lists shall serve for three (3) years; and

The individuals appointed from the lists submitted by the president of the senate and by the speaker of the house of representatives and one of the attorneys appointed by the governor without regard to any of the lists shall serve for four (4) years.

No person shall be appointed at any time to serve more than one term as a member of the commission; provided, however, that a person initially appointed to serve twelve (12) months or less of a full four (4) year term may, upon expiration of that term, be reappointed to serve one full term; and provided further, however, that each member shall continue to serve until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. No commission member shall be a legislator, judge, or elected official, or be a candidate for any public office, or hold any compensated federal, state, or municipal public office or elected office in a political party during his or her tenure or for a period of one year prior to appointment. No member of the commission may hold any other public office (except that of notary public) under the laws of the United States, of this state, or of any other governmental entity for which monetary compensation is received. No members shall be eligible for appointment to a state judicial office during the period of time he or she is a commission member and for a period of one year thereafter. No two (2) or more members of the commission shall be members or employees of the same law firm, or employees of the same profit or nonprofit corporation. Vacancies other than those arising through the expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term in the same manner as vacancies due to the expiration of a term.

A quorum consisting of five (5) members shall be necessary in order for the commission to conduct any business. All names submitted to the governor by the commission shall be approved by at least five (5) members of the commission voting in favor of each selection.

The commission shall have the power to adopt rules and procedures which aid in its selection of the most highly qualified nominees for judicial office. The governor shall designate a member of the commission to serve as chairperson, who shall serve in that capacity for the duration of his or her tenure. All meetings of the commission shall be subject to the open meetings law as defined in chapter 46 of title 42.

The commission is hereby authorized and empowered to investigate the personal background of each nominee as it relates to a determination of judicial fitness through the Rhode Island state police and the attorney general’s office, and to require full financial disclosure under the provisions of chapter 14 of title 36.

The commission shall direct the performance of such administrative duties as may be required for the effective discharge of the obligations granted to the commission, and is hereby empowered to engage the services of legal, secretarial, clerical, and investigative employees and to make such other expenditures as are necessary for the effective performance of its functions. Expenses for office space, staffing, and necessary monetary outlays shall be provided by the department of administration as a separate line item in the state budget under the term “judicial nominating commission.”

Each person appointed to the commission shall, prior to exercising any authority or assuming any duties as a member of the commission, take an engagement of office in accordance with §

36-1-2

. The governor may remove a commission member from office for neglect of duty, malfeasance in office, or conviction of a criminal offense. After a commission member is notified of any allegations against her or him in writing, the commission member shall be entitled to one public hearing prior to removal by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 6; P.L. 2001, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 359, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 447, § 1.

8-16.1-3.
Reimbursement.

Members of the commission shall not be compensated but shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the carrying out of their official duties by the department of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 42, § 1.

8-16.1-4.
Criteria for selection of best qualified nominees.

The commission shall consider, but is not limited to, the following factors in selecting the best qualified nominees: intellect, ability, temperament, impartiality, diligence, experience, maturity, education, publications, and record of public, community, and government service. Every person shall, at the time of consideration by the commission, be an attorney and licensed to practice law in the state of Rhode Island and be a current member of the Rhode Island bar association in good standing.

The commission shall exercise reasonable efforts to encourage racial, ethnic, and gender diversity within the judiciary of this state. To further this goal, on an annual basis, the commission shall report to the general assembly and to the governor on (i) the statistics regarding the race, ethnicity and gender of applicants considered by the commission in the previous year and (ii) efforts made by the commission during the previous year to encourage racial, ethnic and gender diversity within the judiciary of this state. The form of the report and the means by which the commission shall request the necessary information from applicants shall be determined by the commission pursuant to its rule-making authority, except that no applicant shall be required to provide the information as a prerequisite to consideration, and the identifying information with respect to race, ethnicity and gender shall be collected anonymously from applicants. The report shall be made available to the public. The commission shall also consider the candidate’s sensitivity to historically disadvantaged classes, and may disqualify any candidate with a demonstrated history of bias towards any of these classes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 385, § 1.

8-16.1-5.
Nomination and appointment of supreme court justices.

The governor shall immediately notify the commission of any vacancy or prospective vacancy of a justice of the Rhode Island supreme court. The commission shall advertise for each vacancy and solicit prospective candidates and shall consider names submitted from any source. Within ninety (90) days of any vacancy the commission shall publicly submit the names of not less than three (3) and not more than five (5) highly qualified persons for each vacancy to the governor. The governor shall fill any vacancy of any justice of the Rhode Island supreme court by nominating one of the three (3) to five (5) highly qualified persons forwarded to him or her by the commission for the court.

The governor shall fill any such vacancy within twenty-one (21) days of the public submission by the commission.

Each nomination shall be forwarded forthwith to the senate and to the house of representatives, and by and with the advice and consent of the senate, and by and with the separate advice and consent of the house of representatives, each nominee shall be appointed by the governor to serve subject to the general laws. The senate and the house of representatives shall, after seven (7) calendar days of receipt of the nomination, separately consider the nomination, but if either house fails within sixty (60) days after the submission to confirm the nominee, the governor shall appoint some other person to fill the vacancy and shall submit his or her appointment to the senate and to the house of representatives for confirmation in like manner until the senate and the house of representatives shall each separately confirm the nomination. If the nominee is rejected by either house, the commission shall submit a new list of three (3) to five (5) candidates to the governor for the purpose of nomination in accordance with this chapter. Any new list may include but need not be limited to the names of any candidates who were previously submitted to the governor by the commission but who were not forwarded to the senate and to the house of representatives for their advice and consent.

During the time for consideration of the nominees by the senate and by the house of representatives, the judiciary committee of each house shall separately conduct an investigation and public hearing on the question of the qualifications of the nominee or nominees. At the public hearings, the testimony of every witness shall be taken under oath and stenographic records shall be taken and maintained. Further, the judiciary committees shall during the course of their investigations and hearings have the power upon majority vote of the committee members present to issue witness subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum, and orders for the production of books, accounts, papers, records, and documents which shall be signed and issued by the chairperson of the committee, or the person serving in his or her capacity. All such subpoenas and orders shall be served as subpoenas in civil cases in the superior court are served, and witnesses so subpoenaed shall be entitled to the same fees for attendance and travel as provided for witnesses in civil cases in the superior court. If the person subpoenaed to attend before the committee fails to obey the command of the subpoena without reasonable cause, refuse to be sworn, or to be examined, or to answer a legal and pertinent question, or if any person shall refuse to produce books, accounts, papers, records, and documents material to the issue, set forth in an order duly served on him or her, the committee by majority vote of the committee members present may apply to any justice of the superior court, for any county, upon proof by affidavit of the fact, for a rule or order returnable in not less than two (2) nor more than five (5) days, directing the person to show cause before the justice who made the order or any other justice of the superior court, why he or she should not be adjudged in contempt. Upon the return of the order, the justice before whom the matter is brought on for hearing shall examine under oath the person, and the person shall be given an opportunity to be heard, and if the justice shall determine that the person has refused without reasonable cause or legal excuse to be examined or to answer a legal and pertinent question, or to produce books, accounts, papers, records, and documents material to the issue which he or she was ordered to bring or produce, he or she may forthwith commit the offender to the adult correctional institution, there to remain until the person submits to do the act which he or she was so required to do, or is discharged according to law.

The judiciary committees shall, for the purpose of investigating the qualifications of the nominee or nominees, be furnished with a report compiled by the state police in conjunction with the attorney general’s office indicating the determinations and findings of the state police and attorney general’s office investigations concerning the background of the nominee or nominees, and the report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Whether the nominee has ever been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a misdemeanor or felony in this or any other state or foreign country;

Whether the nominee has ever filed a personal bankruptcy petition or an assignment for the benefit of creditors in this or any other state or foreign country; and whether the nominee has ever been a partner in, held ten percent (10%) or more of stock in, or held office in any sole proprietorship, partnership, or corporation that has been involved in bankruptcy or receivership actions as a debtor or because of insolvency at the time the nominee was a partner in, held ten percent (10%) or more stock in, or held office in any such sole proprietorship, partnership, or corporation;

Whether the nominee has ever had a civil judgment rendered against him or her arising out of an allegation of fraud, misrepresentation, libel, slander, professional negligence, or any intentional tort in this state or any other state or foreign country;

The state police in conjunction with the attorney general’s department shall provide in their report the names and addresses of each and every source of their information.

The reports set forth in this section shall be delivered to the chairpersons and members of the judiciary committees in addition to the nominee or nominees only prior to the commencement of the public hearings. Provided, however, that if the nominee or nominees withdraw or decline the appointment prior to the public hearings then the report or reports shall be returned to the chairpersons of the judiciary committees and destroyed.

The committees shall also require a financial statement to be submitted by each nominee, prior to the public hearing, to the chairperson of the committee, to investigate each nominee to determine his or her compliance with the provisions of chapter 14 of title 36.

Any associate justice of the supreme court who is appointed to serve as the chief justice of that court on an interim basis shall retain his or her status as an associate justice until the appointment to chief justice is made permanent.

In case a vacancy shall occur when the general assembly is not in session, the governor shall appoint some person from a list of three (3) to five (5) persons submitted to the governor by the commission to fill the vacancy until the general assembly shall next convene, when the governor shall make an appointment as provided in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 97, § 1.

8-16.1-6.
Nomination and appointment of judges.

The governor shall immediately notify the commission of any vacancy or prospective vacancy of a judge of any state court other than the Rhode Island supreme court. The commission shall advertise for each vacancy and solicit prospective candidates and shall consider names submitted from any source. Within ninety (90) days of any vacancy, the commission shall publicly submit the names of not less than three (3), and not more than five (5), highly qualified persons for each vacancy to the governor. The governor shall fill any vacancy of any judge of the Rhode Island superior court, family court, district court, workers’ compensation court, or any other state court that the general assembly may, from time to time, establish, by nominating one of the three (3) to five (5) highly qualified persons forwarded to him or her by the commission for the court where the vacancy occurs.

The governor shall fill any vacancy within twenty-one (21) days of the public submission by the commission.

Each nomination shall be forwarded forthwith to the senate, and by and with the advice and consent of the senate, each nominee shall be appointed by the governor to serve subject to the general laws. The senate shall, after seven (7) calendar days of receipt of the nomination consider the nomination, but if the senate fails within ninety (90) days after the submission to confirm the nominee, or if the senate does not, by a majority vote of its members, extend the deliberation an additional seven (7) calendar days, the governor shall appoint some other person to fill the vacancy and shall submit his or her appointment to the senate for confirmation in like manner until the senate shall confirm the nomination. If the nominee is rejected by the senate, the commission shall submit a new list of three (3) to five (5) candidates to the governor for the purpose of nomination in accordance with this chapter. Any new list may include, but need not be limited to, the names of any candidates who were previously submitted to the governor by the commission but who were not forwarded to the senate for its advice and consent.

During the time for consideration of the nominees by the senate, the senate judiciary committee shall conduct an investigation and public hearing on the question of the qualifications of the nominee or nominees. At the public hearing, the testimony of every witness shall be taken under oath and stenographic records shall be taken and maintained. Further, the senate judiciary committee shall, during the course of its investigation and hearing, have the power upon majority vote of the committee members present to issue witness subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum, and orders for the production of books, accounts, papers, records, and documents that shall be signed and issued by the chairperson of the committee, or the person serving in his or her capacity. All such subpoenas and orders shall be served as subpoenas in civil cases in the superior court are served, and witnesses so subpoenaed shall be entitled to the same fees for attendance and travel as provided for witnesses in civil cases in the superior court. If the person subpoenaed to attend before the committee fails to obey the command of the subpoena without reasonable cause; refuse to be sworn; or to be examined; or to answer a legal and pertinent question; or if any person shall refuse to produce books, accounts, papers, records, and documents material to the issue, set forth in an order duly served on him or her; the committee by majority vote of the committee members present may apply to any justice of the superior court, for any county, upon proof by affidavit of the fact, for a rule or order returnable in not less than two (2), nor more than five (5), days, directing the person to show cause before the justice who made the order or any other justice of the superior court, why he or she should not be adjudged in contempt. Upon the return of the order, the justice before whom the matter is brought on for hearing shall examine under oath the person, and the person shall be given an opportunity to be heard, and if the justice shall determine that the person has refused without reasonable cause or legal excuse to be examined, or to answer a legal and pertinent question, or to produce books, accounts, papers, records, and documents material to the issue that he or she was ordered to bring or produce, he or she may forthwith commit the offender to the adult correctional institutions, there to remain until the person submits to do the act which he or she was so required to do, or is discharged according to law.

The committee shall, for the purpose of investigating the qualifications of the nominee or nominees, be furnished with a report compiled by the state police in conjunction with the attorney general’s office indicating the determinations and findings of the state police and attorney general’s office investigations concerning the background of the nominee or nominees, and the report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Whether the nominee has ever been convicted of, or pleaded guilty to, a misdemeanor or felony in this or any other state or foreign country;

Whether the nominee has ever filed a personal bankruptcy petition or an assignment for the benefit of creditors in this or any other state or foreign country; and whether the nominee has ever been a partner in, held ten percent (10%) or more of stock in, or held office in any sole proprietorship, partnership, or corporation that has been involved in bankruptcy or receivership actions as a debtor or because of insolvency at the time the nominee was a partner in, held ten percent (10%) or more stock in, or held office in any such sole proprietorship, partnership, or corporation;

Whether the nominee has ever had a civil judgment rendered against him or her arising out of an allegation of fraud, misrepresentation, libel, slander, professional negligence, or any intentional tort in this state or any other state or foreign country;

The state police, in conjunction with the attorney general’s department, shall provide in their report the names and addresses of each and every source of their information.

The reports set forth in this section shall be delivered to the chairperson and members of the senate judiciary committee in addition to the nominee or nominees only prior to the commencement of the public hearing. Provided, however, that if the nominee or nominees withdraw or decline the appointment prior to the public hearing, then the report or reports shall be returned to the chairperson of the judiciary committee and destroyed.

The committee shall also require a financial statement to be submitted by each nominee, prior to the public hearing, to the chairperson of the senate judiciary committee, to investigate each nominee to determine his or her compliance with the provisions of chapter 14 of title 36.

Any associate justice of any state court who is appointed to serve as the chief or presiding justice of that court on an interim basis shall retain his or her status as an associate justice until the appointment to chief or presiding justice is made permanent.

In case a vacancy shall occur when the senate is not in session, the governor shall appoint some person from a list of three (3) to five (5) persons submitted to the governor by the commission to fill the vacancy until the senate shall next convene, when the governor shall make an appointment as provided in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 334, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 402, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 91, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 383, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 287, § 2.

8-16.1-7.
Tenure of justices.

The justices of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court, the workers’ compensation court, and the traffic tribunal shall hold office during good behavior.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 334, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 402, § 2.